Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1980.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3261 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma Higher
Education Fair Admissions Act".

HB1980 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3262 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The purpose of this act is to ensure that individuals seeking
higher education in Oklahoma have an equitable opportunity for
admission, regardless of their criminal history, under specified
conditions.
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3263 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
As used in the Oklahoma Higher Education Fair Admissions Act:
1. "Institution of higher education" means any state
educational institution supported wholly or in part by legislative
appropriations and offering courses of education of any kind beyond
or in addition to the twelfth grade, or its equivalent, as such
grade is generally understood and accepted in the public school
system of Oklahoma, whether called a university, college, junior
college, school, or academy; and
2. "Online student" means a student who will be attending all
classes virtually.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3264 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:

HB1980 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

A. No institution of higher education shall inquire for the
purpose of admission about an applicant's criminal history if the
applicant:
1. Will be attending the institution of higher education as an
online student; and
2. Will not be residing on campus at any point during the
online student's enrollment.
B. Institutions of higher education are prohibited from asking
any questions regarding an applicant's prior behavioral conduct as a
juvenile.
C. The Oklahoma Regents for Higher Education shall oversee and
enforce compliance with this act. Institutions of higher education
found in violation of this act shall be subject to penalties
including, but not limited to, fines and loss of state funding.
SECTION 5. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3265 of Title 70, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
The provisions of the Oklahoma Higher Education Fair Admissions
Act are severable and if any part or provision shall be held void,
the decision of the court so holding shall not affect or impair any
of the remaining parts or provisions of the Oklahoma Higher
Education Fair Admissions Act.
SECTION 6. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
HB1980 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

decl ared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON EDUCATION OVERSIGHT, dated
03/05/2025 - DO PASS, As Coauthored.




















HB1980 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.